Utah statutes.
63G-6-901 (Superseded 05/01/13).   Agreements between public procurement units.

Under the terms agreed upon among the parties, any public procurement unit may enter into agreements with one or more other public procurement units to:

(1)  sponsor, conduct, or administer a cooperative agreement for the procurement or disposal of any supplies, services, or construction;

(2)  cooperatively use supplies or services;

(3)  commonly use or share warehousing facilities, capital equipment, and other facilities;

(4)  provide personnel; provided that the requesting public procurement unit shall pay the public procurement unit providing the personnel the direct and indirect cost of providing the personnel, in accordance with the agreement; or

(5)  make available informational, technical, and other services, provided that the requirements of the public procurement unit tendering the services shall have precedence over the requesting public procurement unit and that the requesting public procurement unit shall pay for the expenses of the services so provided, in accordance with the agreement.



Renumbered and Amended by Chapter 382, 2008 General Session

